Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5305.02
Capacity development strategy; department; solicit public comment.

The department shall develop a capacity development strategy to assist public water systems in acquiring and maintaining technical, managerial, and financial capacity pursuant to section 71-5305.01. The department shall consider and solicit public comment on:

(1) The methods or criteria the department will use to identify and prioritize the public water systems most in need of improving technical, managerial, and financial capacity;

(2) A description of the institutional, regulatory, financial, tax, or legal factors at the federal, state, or local level that encourage or impair capacity development;

(3) A description of how the department will:

(a) Assist public water systems in complying with the Nebraska Safe Drinking Water Act;

(b) Encourage the development of partnerships between public water systems to enhance the technical, managerial, and financial capacity of the systems; and

(c) Assist public water systems in the training and licensure of operators; and

(4) A description of how the department will establish a baseline and measure improvements in capacity with respect to the act.

Laws 1997, LB 517, § 21;

Laws 2001, LB 667, § 36;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 614;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1225.